Utah, session 2026, SB127.
Section 1. Section 53-2d-704 is enacted to read:53-2d-704. Pediatric readiness.(1)As used in this section:(a)(i)"Emergency department" means a general acute hospital department that provides emergency medical care on a 24-hour basis.(ii)"Emergency department" includes a satellite emergency department as that term is defined in Section 26B-2-203.(b)"General acute hospital" means the same as that term is defined in Section 26B-2-201.(c)"Pediatric emergency care coordinator" means an individual designated under Subsection (3) to oversee pediatric emergency care policies, procedures, and training.(d)"Pediatric readiness assessment" means the National Pediatric Readiness Assessment developed by the National Pediatric Readiness Project.(2)An emergency department shall:(a)develop and implement evidence-based policies and procedures for pediatric patient care in the emergency department that address:(i)patient triage protocols;(ii)measuring and recording vital signs;(iii)weighing and recording patient weights in kilograms;(iv)calculating medication dosages for pediatric patients;(v)proper use of pediatric-specific medical equipment; and(vi)age-appropriate care protocols;(b)conduct annual training for emergency department staff on the policies and procedures developed under Subsection (2)(a), including:(i)hands-on training in the use of pediatric equipment through clinical simulation appropriate to each staff member's licensure and role; and(ii)emergency drill exercises that simulate pediatric emergency situations, conducted at least every six months.(3)(a)Each emergency department shall designate a pediatric emergency care coordinator who is a:(i)physician licensed under Title 58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, or Title 58, Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act;(ii)physician assistant licensed under Title 58, Chapter 70a, Utah Physician Assistant Act; or(iii)registered nurse or advance practice registered nurse licensed under Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act.(b)The pediatric emergency care coordinator is responsible for:(i)implementing the policies and procedures required under Subsection (2);(ii)ensuring compliance with pediatric care standards; and(iii)coordinating pediatric emergency care training programs.(4)(a)Each emergency department shall conduct a pediatric readiness assessment in accordance with the timelines prescribed by the National Pediatric Readiness Project.(b)A general acute hospital emergency department may voluntarily conduct the National Pediatric Readiness Project's Open Assessment during a year in which the pediatric readiness assessment is not conducted.(c)Each emergency department shall submit assessment results to the bureau by December 31 of the year in which the assessment occurs.(5)The bureau shall collect overall assessment scores from pediatric readiness assessments conducted by emergency departments under Subsection (4)(a).(6)The bureau may publish aggregate data regarding assessment scores.(7)The bureau shall make rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, that establish minimum standards for pediatric patient care in emergency departments, including:(a)availability and immediate access to pediatric-specific equipment and supplies;(b)staff training requirements;(c)quality assurance measures; and(d)reporting requirements for assessment results.

Section 2:
Section 2.  FY 2027 Appropriations.The following sums of money are appropriated for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, and ending June 30, 2027. These are additions to amounts previously appropriated for fiscal year 2027. Subsection 2(a).Operating and Capital BudgetsUnder the terms and conditions of Title 63J, Chapter 1, Budgetary Procedures Act, the Legislature appropriates the following sums of money from the funds or accounts indicated for the use and support of the government of the state of Utah.CRIMINAL JUSTICEDEPARTMENT OF PUBLIC SAFETYITEM 1Department of Public Safety - Programs ; OperationsFrom General Fund(278,000)Emergency Medical Services(278,000)ITEM 2Department of Public Safety - Public Safety Pass-through GrantsFrom General Fund278,000Pediatric Readiness278,000Under the provisions of Utah Code Annotated Title 63G, Chapter 6b, State Grants, the Legislature intends that the Department of Public Safety provide a direct award grant of $278,000 from the General Fund in fiscal year 2027 to the Utah Pediatric Trauma Network for pediatric readiness as defined in Utah Code Annotated Section 53-2d-704.

Section 3:
Section 3.  Effective Date.This bill takes effect on May 6, 2026.